Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.060

Affidavits at hearing.

On the hearing of an application for an injunction, each party may read affidavits.

[Code 1881 s 157; 1877 p 33 s 157; 1869 p 39 s 155; 1854 p 153 s 115; RRS s 723.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CR 65.